Missouri, session 2026, HB1875.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 376, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 376.683, to read as follows:
376.683. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Emergency medical condition", the same meaning given to the term in
section 376.1350;
(2) "Health benefit plan", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(3) "Health care provider", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(4) "Health care service", the same meaning given to the term in section
376.1350;
(5) "Nonemergency care", any health care service for a medical condition that is
not an emergency medical condition.
2. Before a health care provider provides any nonemergency care for a patient,
the health care provider shall:
(1) Determine whether the patient is covered under a health benefit plan;
(2) Determine its network status with any health benefit plan under which the
patient is covered; and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1875 2
(3) If the health care provider is an out-of-network provider under any health
benefit plan under which the patient is covered, notify the patient, or the person
consenting to the nonemergency care for the patient as described in section 431.061, of
its out-of-network status.
3. The requirements of this section are in addition to, and not in lieu of, any
requirements of federal law, including the federal No Surprises Act, Pub. L. 116-260.
✔